Utah statutes.
31A-17-611.   Immunity.

There may be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action may arise against, the commissioner or the insurance department or its employees or agents for any action taken by them in the performance of their powers and duties under this part.



Enacted by Chapter 9, 1996 Special Session 2

